Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-338
Finding, conclusion, or order; review; final order; service.

(1) The commission may review any finding, conclusion, or order issued under section 20-337. The review shall be completed not later than thirty days after the finding, conclusion, or order is so issued or the finding, conclusion, or order will become final.

(2) The commission shall cause the findings of fact and conclusions of law made with respect to any final order for relief, together with a copy of such order, to be served on each aggrieved person and each respondent in the proceeding.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 39.